Utah statutes.
31A-19a-402.   Purpose.
It is the purpose of this part to:
(1)  establish specific provisions for the filing of workers' compensation
rates in addition to those provided in Part 2;
(2)  provide for review by the department of workers' compensation rate-making
and the results of it; and
(3)  provide for a designated rate service organization to perform certain
functions on behalf of the commissioner.
